src/fst/morphology/affixes/verb_middle_affixes.lexc
LEXICON 3SG-DO-3PL-Sbj
! 3SG direct object with 3PL subject (e.g., ístłí gáʔí "they saw a horse"
! (< gi- + yíʔí), giyáʔí "they saw it (< giyi- + yíʔí))
!
! Since gi- could already have appeared in front of a prefix to the left of
! here, we need two separate paths here: one for when this is the first
! occurrence of gi- (@D.GI@, followed by @P.GI.ON@), and another for the case
! when gi- has already been encountered/expressed (@R.GI@).
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@                                          Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@R.GI@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@yi                  DO-Present;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@D.GI@@P.GI.ON@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@giyi       DO-Present;


LEXICON 3PL-DO
! 3PL direct objects have different forms with non-3 and 3 subjects.
@D.SUBJECTPERSON.3@                                            3PL-DO-Non3-Sbj;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@                                            3PL-DO-3-Sbj;

LEXICON 3PL-DO-Non3-Sbj
! 3PL direct object with non-3 subject (e.g., gimilích'àká yisʔí "I saw their
! horses", gimiyisʔí "I saw them")
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@                                          Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@D.GI@@P.GI.ON@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@gimi       DO-Present;
! TODO: Check this form with Bruce -- "(you sg.) feed them to him/her/it"
! (moghà giminíschúd or gimoghà miníschúd?) or "someone is feeding them to it"
! (moghà gimits'íschúd or gimoghà mits'íschúd?).  Looks like this should be
! moghà, but it would be best to double-check this.
!!@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@R.GI@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@mi                  Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@R.GI@                                     Conative;

LEXICON 3PL-DO-3-Sbj
! 3PL direct object with 3SG subject (e.g., giyilích'àká yíʔí "s/he saw their
! horses", gwáʔí "s/he saw them"/gùʔás "s/he will kick them" [TLQ-20210514])
!
! 3PL direct object with 3PL subject (e.g., gulích'àká gáʔí "they saw their
! horses", gugáʔí "they saw them"/gugìʔás "they will kick them [TLQ-20210514])
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.GIVEN@                                          Conative;
@U.DIRECTOBJECT.NONE@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@gu                        DO-Present;


LEXICON Reflexive-DO
! Reflexive direct objects are accompanied by a change in voice-valence markers
! in Tsuut'ina.  Specifically, VV s- becomes i-, e.g., sinánisʔí "you (sg.)
! look at me!" (nis-, 0s-IPFV) vs. idinániiʔí "you (sg.) look at yourself")
! (nii-, 0i-IPFV).
!
! (Note that, although yi-a and yi-yi perfectives developed historically out of
! differences in voice-valence markers (*d- and *l- --> yi-a, *0- and *ł -->
! yi-yi), these synchronic shifts in voice-valence markers with reflexive
! objects don't cause yi-y perfectives to become yi-a forms in modern-day
! Tsuut'ina (e.g., the reflexive form of mídíyiskid "I asked him/her/it"
! [yis-yi-PFV, *ł-VV] doesn't become yii-a-PFV in a reflexive form like "I
! asked myself").)
!
! Unlike some other Dene languages, this pattern appears only with reflexive
! objects in Tsuut'ina, not with reciprocals; cf. siginásʔín "they are looking
! at me" (0s-IPFV) vs. átłiginásʔín "they are looking at each other" (0s-IPFV)
! vs. igidinááʔín "they are looking at themselves" (0i-IPFV). [TLQ-20210510]
@U.VV.I@                                                    Reflexive-DO-Num;
@U.VV.%0@                                                   Reflexive-DO-Num;

LEXICON Reflexive-DO-Num
! Reflexive objects have the same number as their (coreferential) subjects.
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                     Reflexive-DO-AFF;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                     Reflexive-DO-AFF;

LEXICON Reflexive-DO-AFF
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@idi                  DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@idi                  DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@idi                  DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@idi                  DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@idi                  DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@R.GI@idi            DO-Present;
! Free variation between 3PL.REFL igidi- and idigi-, both used interchangeably
! [TLQ-20210510]
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.GI@@P.GI.ON@igidi DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@D.GI@@P.GI.ON@idigi DO-Present;
! TODO: Check 4SG reflexive objects with Bruce (variation between its'idi-
! and idits'i-, paralleling 3SG variation?).
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@its'idi              DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@idits'i              DO-Present;


LEXICON Reciprocal-DO
! Reciprocal objects have the same number as their subjects.
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.SG@                     Reciprocal-DO-AFF;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@@U.OBJECTNUMBER.PL@                     Reciprocal-DO-AFF;

LEXICON Reciprocal-DO-AFF
! Reciprocal forms only exist with plural and fourth-person subjects, e.g.,
! átłiyasʔí "you (pl.) saw each other", ástłits'áʔí "someone/people saw each
! other".
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@átłi                                    DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@ástłi                                   DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@átłi                 DO-Present;
@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@ástłi                DO-Present;


LEXICON DO-Present
! If the direct object is marked morphologically on the verb, flag that 
! before moving on to handling the conative prefix so that we can more easily
! model the presence or absence of "^L" in transitional transitives and
! ditransitives in the inner affixes.
@U.DIRECTOBJECTPRESENT.ON@                                  Conative;


LEXICON Conative
! Some verbs have a lexically-specified prefix í- ("half-transitive" according
! to Leer 1996/2005, "conative" in K. Rice 2000 and others) that appears
! between the direct object markers and the outer subject markers in Tsuut'ina.
! This prefix contributes a high tone to the final syllable of direct object
! markers in these verbs (e.g., giyízi "they will call him/her/it", from giyi-
! í- zi), and also spreads rightward onto any tonally unspecified syllables up
! to (but not including) the TAMA chunk (e.g., míts'ízi "someone will call
! him/her/it", from mi- í- ts'i- zi).
!
! We mark the presence of this conative/half-transitive prefix using the flag
! CONATIVE, which is set as part of the lexical entry for each verb that
! contains this prefix.  Here, we define two paths: one which sets this flag
! (and eventually matches with @R.CONATIVE.ON@ in the lexicon) and adds the
! prefix, and one that doesn't (and eventually rules out conative-transitive
! forms from being produced/accepted for verbs that don't have this prefix
! specified in the lexicon).
!
! The conative prefix is phonologically unusual in that it appears in middle-
! prefix territory, but appears with outer-prefix TAMA chunk variants: cf.
! conative mínizi "you (sg.) are calling him/her/it" (with full 2SG ni-,
! 0-IPFV) versus non-conative tásítsíh "you (sg.) paint me" (with reduced
! 2SG í-, also 0-IPFV).  We handle this by flipping any @P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@
! flags to @P.PREFIX.OUTER@, which causes the correct TAMA chunk to be
! selected.

@U.CONATIVE.ON@@D.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@P.PREFIX.OUTER@í^H         Outer-Subjects;
@U.CONATIVE.ON@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@P.PREFIX.OUTER@^H          Outer-Subjects;
@U.CONATIVE.OFF@                                            Outer-Subjects;


LEXICON Outer-Subjects

@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                     Filter-SBJ-DO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                     Filter-SBJ-DO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                     Filter-SBJ-DO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.1@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                     Filter-SBJ-DO;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.2@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                     Filter-SBJ-DO;

@U.SUBJECTPERSON.3@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.PL@                     Outer-Subjects-3PL;
@U.SUBJECTPERSON.4@@U.SUBJECTNUMBER.SG@                     Outer-Subjects-4SG;

LEXICON Outer-Subjects-3PL
@R.GI@                                                      Filter-SBJ-DO;
@D.GI@@P.GI.ON@gi                               Outer-Subjects-3PL-WithGi;

LEXICON Outer-Subjects-3PL-WithGi

! We need four paths to produce gi- here:
!
!   1. If this verb contains a conative prefix, then we don't fiddle with
!      any of the flag diacritics (since the conative already sets these
!      to PREFIX.OUTER);
!
!   2. If there isn't a conative prefix and gi- is preceded by the middle
!      prefix for the indefinite object i- "something", then gi- should be
!      treated as a middle prefix;
!
!   3. If there isn't a conative prefix and gi- is preceded by any middle
!      prefix other than the indefinite object i- "something", then gi-
!      should be treated as an inner prefix;
!
!   4. If there isn't a conative prefix and gi- isn't preceded by a middle
!      prefix, then we should treat it as a middle prefix, like usual.
!
! Cases 2 and 3 are really only necessary because of the behaviour of tone
! marking in paradigms like si-PFV and ni-PFV, where inner prefixes and
! direct object markers other than indefinite object i- are associated
! with TAMA chunks that may include a floating low tone.  Middle prefixes
! do not appear with this tone, e.g.,
!
!  (1) tágugìschíízh
!      "they both painted it (a place or space)" (si-PFV with preceding areal
!       direct object marker gu-; not *tágugischíízh, with mid-tone gi-)
!
!  (2) sinì tágischíízh
!      "they both painted my face" (si-PFV with no middle prefixes before gi-;
!       not *tágìschíízh, with low-tone on gi-) [cf. Goddard-20210622]
!
!  (3) náagisʔoł(t)
!      "they both butchered something" (si-PFV with preceding indefinite direct
!       object marker i-; not *náagìsʔoł(t), with low-tone on gi-)
!       [TLL-20250422]

@R.CONATIVE.ON@                                             Filter-SBJ-DO;
@R.CONATIVE.OFF@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@     Filter-SBJ-DO;
@R.CONATIVE.OFF@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@P.PREFIX.INNER@ Filter-SBJ-DO;
@R.CONATIVE.OFF@@D.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@          Filter-SBJ-DO;

LEXICON Outer-Subjects-4SG
! Same, but for ts'i-. (This would be much simpler if we treated inflectional
! allomorphy as a phonologically conditioned alternation between full and
! reduced/contracted froms, with tone-bearing prefixes preventing contraction.
! If that approach worked, then the presence of high-tone í- would result in 
! full TAMA chunks being selected, without needing to monkey around with
! prefix flags like this...)
@R.CONATIVE.ON@                                             Outer-Subjects-4SG-Form;
@R.CONATIVE.OFF@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@R.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@     Outer-Subjects-4SG-Form;
@R.CONATIVE.OFF@@R.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@D.OBJECTPERSON.INDEF@@P.PREFIX.INNER@ Outer-Subjects-4SG-Form;
@R.CONATIVE.OFF@@D.PREFIX.MIDDLE@@P.PREFIX.MIDDLE@          Outer-Subjects-4SG-Form;

LEXICON Outer-Subjects-4SG-Form
! 4SG subject forms with reflexive direct objects are treated here as already
! including the ts'i- subject prefix as part of their direct object markerx
! (i.e., as the portmanteau forms idits'i- / its'idi-), so we don't need to
! generate or accept a separate ts'i- subject prefix in those cases.
@R.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@                                       Filter-SBJ-DO;
@D.OBJECTPERSON.REFL@ts'i                                   Filter-SBJ-DO;


LEXICON Filter-SBJ-DO

! Only provide paths out of this lexicon for transitive forms whose subject-
! object combinations are semantically plausible.

! Skip classes that involve no direct object marking.
@U.VALENCE.INTRANSITIVE@                                    Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.VALENCE.OBLIQUEOBJECT@                                   Filter-SBJ-IO;
@U.VALENCE.TRANSITIVE@                           Filter-SBJ-DO-Conditions;
@U.VALENCE.DITRANSITIVE@                         Filter-SBJ-DO-Conditions;
@U.VALENCE.DO-EXPERIENCER@                       Filter-SBJ-DO-Conditions;
